Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-641
Manufacturer-distributor; records required.

Every licensed manufacturer-distributor shall keep and maintain a complete set of records which shall include all details of all activities of the licensee related to the conduct of the licensed activity as may be required by the department, including the total quantity and types of lottery equipment or supplies sold to any county, city, or village, to any licensed lottery operator, and to other licensed manufacturer-distributors. Such records shall be available for inspection by the department. The records shall be maintained for a period of not less than three years from the date of the end of the licensee's fiscal year.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 81.